Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission

56.860.
Purpose of KRS 56.860 to 56.869.

The purpose of KRS

56.860

to

56.869

is to create an independent commission that will take a comprehensive view of the Commonwealth’s finances and develop policies and strategies that will seek to minimize the impact of fluctuating receipts of revenues on the budget of the Commonwealth and of fluctuating interest rates on the Commonwealth’s interest-sensitive assets and interest-sensitive liabilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 1, effective May 30, 1997.

56.8605.
Definitions for KRS 56.860 to 56.869.

As used in KRS

56.860

to

56.869

:

“Authorized project” means:

Any project approved by the General Assembly and included in an enacted budget; or

Any project approved by the General Assembly that is certified by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet in accordance with the provisions of KRS

56.870

, to be of a type that will independently produce revenues or will be payable from receipts of federal transportation funds that are projected by the commission to be sufficient to fully meet debt service, issuance costs, reserve fund requirements, insurance premiums, or any other expenditures necessary for financing so that no appropriation of state funds is required;

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

“Commercial paper” means obligations that by their terms mature not more than three hundred sixty-six (366) days from the date of their issuance and that may be refunded;

“Commission” means the Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission;

“Estimated revenues” means the official revenue estimates established pursuant to KRS

48.120

on or before the dates on which tax and revenue anticipation notes are awarded to the purchaser;

“Financial agreements” means interest rate swaps, options, or other agreements between two (2) parties to exchange or have the conditional right to exchange interest rate exposure from fixed rate to variable rate or from variable rate to fixed rate, or to provide other economic benefit to an issuance of notes or a portfolio of notes, or to hedge the net interest margin of the Commonwealth;

“Financing agreement” means an agreement between the commission and the cabinet, or between the cabinet and a state agency, relating to the funding of projects or items associated with projects as described in KRS 56.867(3), a judgment against a state agency or the Commonwealth, or the finance or refinance of obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2) or 161.553(2). The provisions of a financing agreement shall require either the cabinet to make payments to the commission relating to the commission’s issuance of notes, or the state agency to make payments to the cabinet reimbursing the cabinet for its payments to the commission on the agency’s behalf. The obligations of the cabinet or the state agency under a financing agreement shall be contingent upon appropriations by the General Assembly to the cabinet or to the agency for the payment of those obligations;

“Fixed-rate obligations” means obligations on which the interest rate remains constant to maturity;

“Funding notes” means notes issued under the provisions of KRS

56.860

to

56.869

by the commission for the purpose of funding:

Judgments, with a final maturity of not more than ten (10) years; and

The finance or refinance of obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2) or 161.553(2);

“Interest-sensitive assets” means tangible and intangible property held by the Commonwealth whose market value is dependent upon the level of interest rates;

“Interest-sensitive liabilities” means interest-bearing debts or other obligations of the Commonwealth or a state agency;

“Multimodal obligations” means obligations for which the time period for establishing the rate of interest may be selectively determined and altered;

“Net interest margin” means the net income or expense associated with the difference between the Commonwealth’s interest-sensitive assets and interest-sensitive liabilities;

“Project notes” means notes issued under the provisions of KRS

56.860

to

56.869

by the commission with a final maturity of not more than twenty (20) years for the purpose of funding authorized projects, which may include bond anticipation notes;

“State agency” means any state administrative body, agency, department, or division as defined in KRS

42.005

, and set out in KRS Chapter 12, or any board, commission, institution, state university, or division exercising any function of the Commonwealth;

“Tax and revenue anticipation notes” means notes that are issued under the provisions of KRS

56.860

to

56.869

by the commission with a final maturity that is no later than the last day of the fiscal year during which the tax and revenue anticipation notes are issued and that are issued in anticipation of estimated revenues to be received in that fiscal year; and

“Variable-rate demand obligations” means obligations on which the rate of interest is set by reference to a predetermined index or formula, by auction, by an agent that, in the sole judgment of the commission, has the financial expertise to establish market interest rates, or by similar means.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 2, effective May 30, 1997; 2004, ch. 99, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 78, § 36, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 172, § 1, effective April 26, 2010.

56.861.
Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission — Membership — Status as public corporation — Selection of certain advisors — Issuance of notes.

There is recognized as an independent agency of the state within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12, and as a constituted authority of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a state and a sovereign entity within the meaning of regulations of the United States Department of Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, a Kentucky Asset/Liability Commission composed of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, who shall be chair; the Attorney General; the State Treasurer; the executive director of the Office of the Controller; and the state budget director, or their alternates as authorized in KRS

56.865

. The vice chair shall be elected from among the membership.

Any three (3) members of the commission, or their alternates, shall constitute a quorum and shall by a majority vote be authorized to transact any and all business of the commission.

No member shall receive any salary, fee, or other remuneration for services as a member of the commission, but each shall be entitled to reimbursement for ordinary traveling expenses, including meals and lodging, incurred in the performance of the member’s duties.

The commission shall constitute a public body corporate with perpetual succession and power in name to contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, adopt bylaws not inconsistent with KRS

56.860

to

56.869

, have and use a corporate seal, and exercise all of the powers granted private corporations generally in KRS Chapter 271B, except as the same may be inconsistent with KRS

56.860

to

56.869

.

The selection of bond counsel, senior managing underwriter, or financial advisor to the commission shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

45A.840

to

45A.879

.

Notes issued pursuant to KRS

56.860

to

56.869

may be sold on a competitive or negotiated sale basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 3, effective May 30, 1997; 2005, ch. 85, § 84, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 31, effective June 25, 2009.

56.862.
Office of Financial Management — Staffing function for commission.

The Office of Financial Management within the Office of the Controller shall serve as staff to the commission. The executive director of the Office of Financial Management shall serve as secretary to the commission. The commission shall coordinate with the Office of the Controller to ensure that the necessary financial data is made available.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 46, § 21, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 85, effective June 20, 2005.

56.863.
Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission shall have the power and duty to:

Maintain the records and perform the functions necessary and proper to accomplish the purposes of KRS

56.860

to

56.869

;

Promulgate administrative regulations relating to KRS

56.860

to

56.869

;

Conduct analysis to determine the impact of fluctuating receipts of revenues on the budget of the Commonwealth, fluctuating interest rates upon the interest-sensitive assets and interest-sensitive liabilities of the Commonwealth, and the resulting change in the net interest margin on the budget of the Commonwealth;

Develop strategies to mitigate the impact of fluctuating receipts of revenues on the budget of the Commonwealth and of fluctuating interest rates on the Commonwealth’s interest-sensitive assets and interest-sensitive liabilities;

Report its findings to the State Investment Commission at least annually to assist the State Investment Commission in developing and implementing its investment strategy. The State Investment Commission shall provide the commission with a copy of its monthly investment income report to aid the commission in developing and implementing its strategies;

Issue funding notes, project notes, and tax and revenue anticipation notes or other obligations on behalf of any state agency to fund authorized projects or to satisfy judgments;

Refund any funding notes, project notes, or tax and revenue anticipation notes issued under KRS

56.860

to

56.869

to achieve economic savings, to better match receipts with expenditures, or as a part of a continuing finance program;

Designate individual employees or officers of the Office of Financial Management within the Office of the Controller as agents for purposes of approving the principal amount of tax and revenue anticipation notes, the interest rate, the discount, maturity date, and other relevant terms of tax and revenue anticipation notes, project notes, and funding notes or refunding notes issued within constraints established by the commission and to execute agreements, including notes and financial agreements, for the commission;

Enter into financial agreements for the purpose of hedging its current or projected interest-sensitive assets and interest-sensitive liabilities to stabilize the Commonwealth’s net interest margin, as deemed necessary by the commission, subject to administrative regulations promulgated by the commission that limit the net exposure of the Commonwealth as a result of these financial agreements;

Deposit net interest payments and premiums received by the commission under financial agreements into a restricted account, which shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year but shall continue to accumulate to act as security for these financial agreements. This duty is mandatory in nature. Any accumulated funds in excess of the amount determined by the commission to be necessary to establish this security may be applied to debt service payments, net interest payments, and premiums and expenses related to interest-sensitive liabilities; and

Report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on a semiannual basis, by September 30 and March 31 of each year, the following:

A description of the Commonwealth’s investment and debt structure;

The plan developed to mitigate the impact of fluctuating revenue receipts on the budget of the Commonwealth and fluctuating interest rates on the interest-sensitive assets and interest-sensitive liabilities of the Commonwealth, including an analysis of the impact that a change in the net interest margin would have on the budget of the Commonwealth. The report due by March 31 of each year shall reflect the strategy for January through June of the fiscal year, and the report due by September 30 shall reflect the strategy for July through December of the fiscal year;

The principal amount of notes issued, redeemed, and outstanding; and a description of all financial agreements entered into during the reporting period. The report due by March 31 shall include information about agreements entered into from July through December of the fiscal year. The report due by September 30 shall include information about agreements entered into between January and June of the prior fiscal year; and

A summary of gains and losses associated with financial agreements and any other cash flow strategies undertaken by the commission to mitigate the effect of fluctuating interest rates during each reporting period. The report due by March 31 shall include information about agreements and strategies entered into or undertaken from July through December of the fiscal year. The report due by September 30 shall include information about agreements and strategies entered into or undertaken from January through June of the prior fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 5, effective May 30, 1997; 2000, ch. 46, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 86, effective June 20, 2005.

56.864.
Form of financing for tax and revenue anticipation notes, project notes, and funding notes.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes, project notes, and funding notes may be variable-rate or fixed-rate obligations issued in the form of commercial paper, fixed-rate obligations, variable-rate demand obligations, multimodal obligations, commercial bank loans, or other commercially-reasonable forms of financing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 6, effective May 30, 1997.

56.865.
Designation of alternates by commission members — Scope of authority — Joint certificate concerning designation.

Each member of the commission may designate, by an instrument in writing over the member’s signature and filed with the commission as a public record, an alternate with full authority to:

Attend, in the absence of the appointing member for any reason, any properly-convened meeting of the commission; and

Participate in the consideration of, and voting upon, business and transactions of the commission.

Any designation of an alternate may, at the appointing member’s direction:

Be limited upon the face of the appointing instrument to be effective only for a designated meeting or only for specified business;

Be shown on the face of the appointing instrument to be on a continuing basis, but in no case for a period of more than four (4) years, whenever the appointing member is unable to attend;

Be revoked by the appointing member in an instrument of like formality, similarly filed with the secretary as a public record of the commission.

Any party transacting business with the commission or materially affected by the commission shall be entitled to accept and rely upon a joint certificate of the secretary of the commission and any member of the commission concerning the designation of any alternate, the time and scope of designation, and if of a continuing nature, whether the designation has been revoked, and when. The joint certificate shall be made and delivered to the party within a reasonable time after written request is made with acceptable identification of the business or transaction referred and of the requesting party’s interest.

Each alternate shall be a person on the staff of the appointing member or shall be in the employ of the appointing member’s agency or department of the government of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 7, effective May 30, 1997.

56.866.
Tax and revenue anticipation notes — Purpose — Sale and issuance — Report to Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.

As the receipt of revenues and expenditure demands of a particular fund or account of the Commonwealth render it necessary, the commission may issue tax and revenue anticipation notes to discharge expenditure demands in anticipation of estimated revenues that are required to be deposited in that fund or account during the fiscal year in which the tax and revenue anticipation notes are issued. Tax and revenue anticipation notes may be sold and issued in the manner and have terms relating to the payment of interest, principal, and premiums or discounts as market conditions warrant. Tax and revenue anticipation notes may be issued in an amount not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the estimated revenues anticipated to be deposited during the fiscal year in the fund or account for which the tax and revenue anticipation notes are being issued. Tax and revenue anticipation notes, together with interest thereon, shall be repaid from revenues required to be deposited in the fund for which the tax and revenue anticipation notes were issued. Revenues to be deposited in that fund or account shall be pledged for the repayment of tax and revenue anticipation notes so long as any tax and revenue anticipation notes remain outstanding. Any lien on and security interest in taxes or revenues that may be created as provided in this section shall be prior and superior to any other lien or security interest created by law or otherwise.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes may be refunded or reissued, in whole or in part.

Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, including without limitation KRS

56.870

, no approvals beyond those specifically required in this section shall be required for the issuance, sale, and delivery of the tax and revenue anticipation notes.

The commission shall report the issuance of tax and revenue anticipation notes to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee within thirty (30) days of issuance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 8, effective May 30, 1997.

56.867.
Project notes — Sale and issuance — Purposes — Approval — Status of notes with respect to the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions.

The commission may issue and sell project notes for authorized projects upon request by the cabinet. Project notes may be sold and issued in a manner and have terms relating to the payment of interest, principal, and premiums or discounts as market conditions warrant.

Appropriations requests for payments under the financing agreements on project notes shall be made by the state agency requesting an authorized project unless the payments are to be payable from funds not subject to appropriation. Project notes, together with interest thereon, shall be repaid from payments received by the commission from the cabinet under a financing agreement. The cabinet shall enter into financing agreements with the commission for the issuance of project notes. State agencies requesting funding for an authorized project shall enter into an agreement with the cabinet for the issuance of project notes by the commission for that state agency. Agreements authorized by this section shall be either financing agreements, or alternative agreements which specify that any payments shall be made from funds that are not subject to appropriation by the General Assembly.

Project notes may be issued for the following purposes:

To pay any or all the costs of an authorized project for any state agency; and

To refund outstanding project notes or other obligations of any state agency.

Project notes shall have a maximum maturity not to exceed one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the expected useful economic life of the project as estimated by the commission, and if more than one (1) project is being financed by the project notes, then the weighted average of the expected useful economic lives shall be used.

The issuance of project notes shall be subject to KRS

56.870

, to approval by the State Property and Buildings Commission, and to review by the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee pursuant to KRS

45.810

.

Project notes may be refunded, in whole or in part, from the proceeds of bonds or other obligations issued by any state agency authorized to issue bonds or other obligations.

Project notes shall not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 9, effective May 30, 1997.

56.868.
Funding notes — Purposes — Sale and issuance — Approval — Status of notes with respect to the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions.

The commission may issue and sell funding notes for the purposes of funding judgments against the Commonwealth or any state agency and financing or refinancing obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2) or 161.553(2). Funding notes may be sold and issued in a manner and have terms relating to the payment of interest, principal, and premiums or discounts as market conditions warrant.

Appropriations requests for payment of principal and interest on funding notes shall be made by the state agency against which a judgment has been rendered or, in the case of financing or refinancing obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2) or 161.553(2), to the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System. Funding notes, together with interest thereon, shall be repaid from payments received by the commission from the cabinet under a financing agreement.

Funding notes may be issued for the following purposes:

To pay for judgments, which shall include legal settlements, court-ordered actions against the Commonwealth or any state agency, and any part of any expense or cost incidental to legal settlements or court-ordered actions against the Commonwealth or any state agency;

To finance or refinance obligations owed under KRS 161.550(2) or 161.553(2); and

To refund outstanding issues of funding notes.

The issuance of funding notes shall be subject to KRS

56.870

, to approval by the State Property and Buildings Commission, and to review by the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee pursuant to KRS

45.810

.

The cabinet, in providing for the expenditure of funds for any of the purposes mentioned in this section, may provide by a financing agreement with the state agency so affected for the funding of the Commonwealth’s or that state agency’s judgment, and the state agency so affected is authorized to enter into a financing agreement with the cabinet for that purpose.

Funding notes shall not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision, but the notes shall be payable solely from payments received under the financing agreement relating to the funding notes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 10, effective May 30, 1997; 2010, ch. 172, § 2, effective April 26, 2010.

56.869.
Tax exemptions for notes issued by the commission — Negotiability of notes.

Interest on all funding notes, project notes, and tax and revenue anticipation notes issued by the commission shall be exempt from income taxation and the funding notes, project notes, and tax and revenue anticipation notes shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation by the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions. All funding notes, project notes, and tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to KRS

56.860

to

56.869

shall be negotiable instruments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 11, effective May 30, 1997.